Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202118-1718
Annexation; contest; limitation of action.

Any action or proceeding of any kind or nature, whether legal or equitable, which is brought to contest any annexation of property made by any city or village, shall be brought within one year from the effective date of such annexation or such action or proceeding shall be forever barred. The period of time prescribed by this section for bringing an action shall not be tolled or extended by nonresidence or disability.

Laws 1967, c. 82, § 2, p. 258;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 101.
August 28, 2021